Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 8 Bonded Indebtedness of State

35-8-1.
Certificates of indebtedness issued for coupon bonds surrendered — Transfer.

Whenever the holder of any coupon bond of this state shall surrender the bond, with the unpaid coupons belonging thereto, to the general treasurer, and shall request that he or she issue a certificate of that surrender, the general treasurer shall make an entry of the surrender in a book, to be by him or her kept for that purpose, and he or she shall issue a certificate thereof to the person surrendering the bond, countersigned by the secretary of state, who shall affix thereto the seal of the state, which certificate shall be duly recorded, and shall entitle the person receiving the certificate to receive the amount mentioned in the surrendered bond, and the interest thereon, at the times and places in the surrendered bond set forth.

The certificate shall not be transferable except by order of the holder thereof, or of his or her personal representative, made thereon, with notice to the general treasurer of the assignment. Upon the receipt of notice of the assignment, the general treasurer shall enter a memorandum thereof upon the record of the certificate. Whenever a certificate of indebtedness issued in accordance with these provisions is transferred, the general treasurer shall, on application of the person to whom the certificate is so transferred, cancel the certificate, and thereupon issue to the person a new certificate, countersigned and sealed, for the amount of principal then due on the certificate so cancelled.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-1

.

35-8-2.
Destruction of bonds and certificates unsold or repurchased by state — Certificate.

All bonds, coupons, and certificates of indebtedness which have or shall become the property of the state, except those held by the sinking fund commission, and all bonds, coupons, and certificates of indebtedness which have been issued by the state but which have not been sold during a period of five (5) years after the issuance of the bonds, coupons, and certificates of indebtedness, shall, within a reasonable time after the five-year period, be destroyed by the general treasurer by burning the bonds and certificates, in the presence of the secretary of state, the director of administration, and the attorney general, who shall make, sign, and deliver to the general treasurer a certificate containing the number, date of issue, and denomination of each bond, and of each coupon and certificate of indebtedness so destroyed, and of the time when destroyed, which certificate shall be, by the general treasurer, with his or her next report, transmitted to the general assembly.

At his or her discretion, the general treasurer may authorize the banks acting as fiscal agents of the state for these bonds and certificates of indebtedness to destroy the bonds, coupons, and certificates of indebtedness paid by them and submit to the general treasurer a notarized certificate of destruction in place of the paid bonds, coupons, and certificate of indebtedness, listing in numerical order the bond issue, bond and/or coupon number, date of issue, and denominations of each bond and of each coupon and certificate of indebtedness so destroyed and the time when destroyed. The destruction certificate, to be provided by the general treasurer, shall be submitted by the fiscal agents in regular intervals each month, together with a certification of the balance of the funds remaining in each bond account for the indebtedness matured and not presented for payment. The general treasurer and the state shall not be held liable for any bond, coupon, or certificate of indebtedness certified as reported destroyed by any bank acting as fiscal agents of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 686, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-2

; P.L. 1975, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 102.

35-8-3.
Sinking fund commission — Composition — Elective members — Quorum.

There is hereby authorized, created and established in the department of the general treasurer a sinking fund commission which shall perform the duties formerly performed by the board of commissioners of sinking funds as prescribed by this chapter, which board of commissioners is hereby abolished. The sinking fund commission shall consist of the governor or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the governor’s office, the general treasurer or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the general treasurer’s office, the director of administration or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the department of administration, two (2) members of the general public shall be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall serve an initial term of three (3) years and one of whom shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and four (4) members of the general public shall be appointed by the general treasurer, one of whom shall serve an initial term of four (4) years and one of whom shall serve an initial term of three (3) years, one of whom shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and one of whom shall serve an initial term of one year. Thereafter, all general public member appointments shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. All general public member appointments shall be with the advice and consent of the senate. The appointed members shall be qualified by training or experience in the fields of investment or finance. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state. Public members of the commission shall be removable by the chair for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

Newly appointed and qualified public members shall, within six (6) months of their appointment, attend a training course that shall be developed and provided by the office of the general treasurer and shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 35-8, 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2 of the Rhode Island general laws; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act, prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2.

A majority of all the members of the commission is necessary to constitute a quorum.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year during which the commission has conducted business, the commission shall submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, meeting minutes if requested, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all the funds received and expended including the source of funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the board; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to §

35-8-3

; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and the secretary of state’s website as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

of the Rhode Island general laws. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-3

; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 26, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 72; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 1.

35-8-4.
Succession of sinking fund commission to previous board.

The sinking fund commission shall perform the duties prescribed by this chapter. Wherever in any general law, public law, or resolution of the general assembly, or in any document, record, instrument, or proceeding authorized by law or resolution, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires, the words “board of commissioners of sinking funds” or any reference to that board of commissioners appears, the words or reference shall be construed to mean the “sinking fund commission” created by this chapter, and wherever the words “state budget director and comptroller” appear, they shall be construed to mean “director of administration”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-4

.

35-8-5.
Officers of sinking fund commission.

The governor shall be the chairperson, the general treasurer shall be the vice-chairperson, and the director of administration shall be the secretary of the sinking fund commission, and the general treasurer shall keep the accounts of the commission. In the event of the governor’s absence, the general treasurer shall be the chairperson. A designee of any member shall not serve as chairperson. The commission shall elect from among its own members such officers as they deem necessary.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-5

; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 472, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 444, § 1.

35-8-6.
Control and management of sinking funds — Investment.

The sinking fund commission shall have the control and management of all sinking funds established for the redemption of any bonds or certificates of indebtedness issued by the state, except for investments which are made by the state investment commission under the provisions of chapter 10 of this title. Any and all bonds or certificates of indebtedness of the state purchased as an investment for the sinking fund for the redemption of bonds of the same issue shall be held in the sinking fund subject to the order of the commission or until the bonds shall by their terms become due and payable. For the purposes of this section, refunding escrows established by the state in connection with the refinancing of any bonds, notes or certificates of indebtedness including, without limitation, refunding escrows established in connection with the refinancing of any certificates of participation issued by or at the direction of the state, shall not constitute sinking funds established for the redemption of any bonds or certificates of indebtedness issued by the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 5; P.L. 1925, ch. 612, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 5; P.L. 1940, ch. 882, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1217, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-6

; impl. am. P.L. 1958, ch. 164; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 26, § 2.

35-8-6.1.
Exclusion from sinking fund commission authority.

Notwithstanding any general law or special law to the contrary, the sinking fund commission shall have no authority to take or cause to be taken any action or actions that would adversely affect the exclusion from income taxation of interest on any bonds, notes or certificates of indebtedness, including without limitation the interest portion of any certificates of participation issued by or at the direction of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 26, § 3.

35-8-6.2.
Sinking funds to replace bond issuance.

Prior to the issuance of previously authorized general obligation debt contained in the capital improvement plan, the sinking fund commission may cause a savings analysis to be performed to determine if the estimated savings resulting from the defeasance of the general obligation debt recommended for defeasance by the sinking fund is more or less than the savings which would be achieved if the previously authorized general obligation debt were not issued. In the event that the sinking fund commission makes a finding that the savings would be greater from not issuing the previously authorized general obligation debt, then the sinking fund commission may use sinking funds to replace, in whole or in part, the same debt authorization.

Upon the sinking fund commission’s determination to use sinking funds to replace, in whole or in part, authorized but unissued general obligation debt authorization, the amount designated by the sinking fund commission is hereby appropriated for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 3, § 2.

35-8-7.
[Obsolete.]

35-8-8.
Safekeeping of securities and records of sinking fund commission.

The sinking fund commission shall make provision for the safekeeping of its securities, and it may hire and pay for a place of security. The records and books of account of the commission shall be deposited in the vault in the office of the general treasurer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-8

.

35-8-9.
Records and annual report of sinking fund commission.

The sinking fund commission shall keep a full record of its meetings and proceedings. The commission shall make a full report in writing to the general assembly on or before the tenth day of January in each year, showing respectively the conditions and manner of the investments of the sinking fund or sinking funds on the thirtieth day of June preceding, the estimated savings from the commission’s refinancing of debt in the prior fiscal year, the estimated total debt service payments of the debt retired by the commission in the prior fiscal year, and shall in the report certify that the various investment securities in the sinking funds have been examined by the director of administration.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 8; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 8; P.L. 1931, ch. 1787, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 8; P.L. 1942, ch. 1216, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-9

; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 26, § 2.

35-8-10.
Expenses of sinking fund commission members.

The actual expenses of the members of the sinking fund commission, when certified by the secretary and approved by the governor, shall be paid from the state treasury.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-10

.

35-8-10.1.
Expenses of sinking fund commission.

The commission may incur reasonable expenses in the fulfillment of its duties, including but not limited to bond counsel and financial advisement. These expenses shall be paid out of the commission’s annual appropriation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 26, § 3.

35-8-11.
Payments into sinking funds.

Beginning with fiscal year 2005, the sinking fund shall receive such sums as may be appropriated by the General Assembly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 11; P.L. 1931, ch. 1696, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 882, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-11

; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 26, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 6, § 1.

35-8-12.
Annual deficit payments to sinking fund commission.

Annually, within five (5) days after the fifteenth of June in each fiscal year, the sinking fund commission shall certify in writing to the controller the sum necessary to offset any deficit then existing in the sinking fund and thereupon, on or before the last business day of the fiscal year, it shall be the duty of the controller to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer, directing the treasurer to transfer that sum from the general fund to the sinking fund.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 882, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-12

.

35-8-13.
Surplus remaining after redemption of bonds.

All sums of money remaining in the hands of the sinking fund commission, after the redemption of any bonds, shall, if not otherwise directed by the general assembly, be added by them to the sinking fund for the bonds yet to mature.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 32, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 42, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-13

.

35-8-14.
General sinking fund established.

The general treasurer is authorized and directed to establish a general sinking fund for the purpose of providing funds for the payment of all state bonds at maturity, including all bonds authorized and issued according to law, and to transfer all the existing sinking funds to the general sinking fund. Wherever in any general law, public law, act, or resolution of the general assembly provision is made for the establishment of a sinking fund to extinguish a state debt at its maturity, that provision shall be construed to mean an addition to the general sinking fund for the redemption of state bonds at their maturity in conformity with this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 13; P.L. 1931, ch. 1696, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-14

.

35-8-15.
Custody of securities in general sinking fund.

Subject to the provisions of §

35-8-8

, and to the orders of the sinking fund commission or the state investment commission, the general treasurer shall have the custody of all securities in the general sinking fund established under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 43, § 14; P.L. 1931, ch. 1696, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-15

; impl. am. P.L. 1958, ch. 164.

35-8-16.
Board for replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or notes.

The attorney general, the secretary of state, and the general treasurer are hereby constituted a board, hereinafter referred to in §§

35-8-17

—

35-8-18

as “the board”, to carry out the provisions of those sections.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 15; P.L. 1939, ch. 668, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-16

.

35-8-17.
Replacement or repair of damaged bonds or notes.

Whenever the board is satisfied that any instrument or printed or written paper presented to it is in fact a valid bond or note of the state but it is so damaged that its condition is such as to hinder or prevent the owner or holder thereof from making good delivery of the bond or note, the board may, upon payment to it by the owner or holder thereof of such a sum as it deems necessary to cover the actual expense involved, cause the damage to be repaired or remedied by requiring the proper officers of the state to sign the bond or note in place of their damaged or destroyed signatures or those of their predecessors in office, to issue a duplicate bond or note, or to do whatever else the board may require of them to repair or remedy the damage. But no duplicate bond or note shall be so issued except upon the surrender of the original bond or note, which shall thereupon be cancelled forthwith, and the repaired or duplicate bond or note shall be treated in all respects as a valid obligation of the state. On every repaired or duplicate bond or note the general treasurer shall certify on the back thereof that the bond or note has been repaired or issued under the provisions of this section and the certification shall be conclusive proof that the bond or note has been repaired or issued in accordance with the requirements of the board and that it is a valid obligation of the state in accordance with its terms.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 15; P.L. 1939, ch. 668, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-17

.

35-8-18.
Replacement of lost or destroyed bond or note —
Bond to protect state.

Whenever the board is satisfied that any bond or note of the state has been lost or destroyed, the board may, upon payment to it by the owner or holder thereof of such a sum as it deems necessary to cover the actual expense involved and under such regulations and with such restrictions as it may prescribe, order the general treasurer and/or such other officers of the state as the board may designate to issue a duplicate of the bond or note, payable at the same time, bearing the same rate of interest as the bond or note so lost or destroyed, and so marked as to show the number if known and date of the original bond or note. No duplicate shall be issued until the owner of the lost or destroyed bond or note shall give to the general treasurer a bond in double the amount of the lost or destroyed bond or note and of the interest which would accrue until the principal is due and payable, with two (2) sufficient sureties both residents of the state, or with a surety company authorized to do business in this state, approved by the board, conditioned to indemnify and save harmless the state from any claim or demand on account of the lost or destroyed bond or note.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 15; P.L. 1939, ch. 668, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-18

.

35-8-19.
Substitution of coupon bond for registered bond or registered bond for coupon bond.

Whenever the holder of any registered or coupon bond of this state which is now or shall hereafter be issued or outstanding shall desire to substitute the registered bond for a coupon bond, or the coupon bond for a registered bond, he or she shall present the coupon bond to the general treasurer with a request in writing for the substitution for the bond of one or more other bonds. The general treasurer, upon payment to him or her for the use of the state of such a sum as he or she deems necessary to cover the actual expense involved and under such regulations and restrictions as he or she may prescribe, is authorized and empowered to accept the bond so presented and to issue and deliver in substitution thereof one or more new bonds of denominations of one thousand dollars ($1,000), five thousand dollars ($5,000), ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000); provided, that the aggregate face value of the new bonds shall not exceed the face value of the bond so presented; provided, further, that if the new bonds bear coupons, the coupons shall cover only future interest payments. The new bonds shall in all substantial respect (except the denomination thereof) be similar to the bond so presented as to the date of maturity, interest rate, and dates of interest payments; and every new bond so issued in substitution shall be as valid for all purposes as the bond so presented for substitution, notwithstanding the fact that the number thereof or the signatures thereon or the denomination thereof may be different from the bond so presented for substitution. In every case the general treasurer shall mutilate the bond so presented for substitution and shall make a record of the date, number, and amount thereof, and of the date, number, and amount of every new bond issued in substitution. Thereafter the mutilated bond shall be kept in the files of the general treasurer or may be destroyed in the same manner as provided in §

35-8-2

. Every new bond issued in substitution shall be signed by the general treasurer and by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 107, § 15; P.L. 1940, ch. 883, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1521, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-8-19

.

35-8-20.
Minibonds.

Notwithstanding any provision of general or public law to the contrary, whenever the general treasurer is authorized by any general or public law to issue and sell bonds of the state, he or she may determine, with the approval of the governor, to issue and sell all or a portion of the bonds in denominations of one hundred dollars ($100), five hundred dollars ($500), one thousand dollars ($1,000), or any multiple of one thousand dollars ($1,000). Bonds issued in denominations of one hundred dollars ($100), five hundred dollars ($500), or one thousand dollars ($1,000) are hereinafter called “minibonds”. The general treasurer may issue and sell minibonds at public or private sale at par or at a discount, maturing in such amounts and upon such dates, bearing interest at such rate or rates, payable as to both principal and interest at such time or times and in such manner, in bearer or registered form, and upon such other terms and conditions, all as the general treasurer, with the approval of the governor, shall determine to be in the best interest of the state. Each minibond may, at the determination of the general treasurer, also provide that it shall be redeemed by the state at the option of the holder or registered owner upon due presentment on any business day at least one month from its date at such price and on such terms as the general treasurer shall fix, with the approval of the governor, at the time of issue of the minibonds; provided, that if so determined and provided:

Not more than ten percent (10%) of the face amount originally authorized shall be sold by the general treasurer in any one fiscal year;

No minibond shall mature more than five (5) years after its date; and

No one sale to a single purchaser of minibonds shall be in an aggregate face amount greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 177, § 1.

35-8-21.
Consolidation of bond issues.

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to two (2) or more bond or note authorization acts may be consolidated for the purpose of sale and issued, sold, printed, and delivered as a single bond or note issue despite the requirement of any bond or note authorization act requiring or designating a particular total for bonds or notes issued pursuant to that act. Notwithstanding any requirement of the authorization act that bonds or notes issued thereunder shall bear any particular designation, bonds or notes consolidated pursuant to this section shall be designated on their face “Consolidated Capital Development Loan of”, followed by the year of issue and the series thereof in that year, or shall bear such other designation on their face as the general treasurer shall deem appropriate. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the general treasurer shall separately account for the bonds or notes issued under the proceeds received from bond or note sales under the particular authorizing act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 302, § 1.

35-8-22.
Rebate to federal government.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of general or special law, the state and its agencies may rebate to the United States treasury any income from investments (including gains from the disposition of investments) of proceeds of bonds or notes to the extent deemed necessary to exempt (in whole or in part) the interest paid on the bonds or notes from federal income taxation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 110, § 5.

35-8-23.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 110, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 8, effective July 12, 1990.

35-8-24.
Bonds to be eligible for Rhode Island savings bond program.

Unless otherwise provided therein, public laws which authorize the state to issue its general obligation bonds are “general obligation bond acts” as that term is defined in §

35-15-2(2)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 426, § 5; P.L. 1990, ch. 54, § 3.

35-8-25.
Extinguishment of authorized but unissued debt.

Any special act of the state which:

Authorizes the issuance of general obligation bonds or notes of the state;

Has a balance which remains unissued; and

Is seven (7) years or older;

shall become invalid, but only as to that portion which remains unissued. The seven (7) year period shall be measured form the date the debt authorization was approved by the vote of the people.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the general assembly by special act may extend any authorization for a period of one to five (5) years, upon a petition of the department of administration. The extension may be granted one or more times.

Upon certification by the general treasurer to the governor, debt authorizations described in subsection (a) of this section and not extended under the provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall no longer be deemed or be counted toward the authorized but unissued debt of the state. No petition under subsection (b) of this section may be made with respect to any authorization the expiration of which has been so certified.

Upon the disbursement of sinking funds to replace the unissued general obligation debt authorization, the replaced unissued general obligation debt authorization shall be extinguished in the amount equal to the disbursement from the sinking fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 3, § 1.

35-8-26.
Refunding bonds.

When bonds or notes have been issued as provided in this chapter, the general treasurer shall be authorized and empowered hereby, with the approval of the governor and in accordance with this chapter, to issue, from time to time, refunding bonds or notes of the state to refund any of such outstanding bonds or notes as may be specified from time to time by the governor provided that the outstanding amount of debt on account of any project shall not be increased thereby to an amount in excess of the amount approved for such project by the people.

If the people shall have approved the issuance of refunding bonds or notes, at the election at which the incurring of debt for the respective project or projects was approved or as a separate approval at another time, the proceeds of the refunding bonds or notes, exclusive of any premium or accrued interest thereon, shall upon receipt be applied to retire the bonds or notes being refunded or shall be deposited by the general treasurer with an escrow agent, which may be the paying agent for the bonds being refunded, in trust for application to payment of such bonds or notes at maturity or upon earlier call. Such escrowed amounts shall be invested for the benefit of the owners of the refunded bonds or notes and shall be invested only in direct or guaranteed obligations of the United States of America or the state of Rhode Island. Money held in escrow, together with the earnings thereon, shall be applied to any principal, interest and early redemption premiums, if any, to the owners of the refunded bonds or notes, in accordance with the instructions of the general treasurer included in the terms of the escrow. An amount of bonds or notes being refunded, which is the largest amount of such bonds or notes for which the escrowed deposit will provide sufficient funds to pay all principal, interest and early redemption premiums, if any, when due, will be considered no longer outstanding and not debts of the state for the purpose of determining the amount of debt outstanding for the respective project or projects from and after the deposit of funds into escrow.

If the people have not approved the issuance of refunding bonds or notes as aforesaid, the general treasurer may nevertheless issue refunding bonds or notes as provided herein for the purpose of paying or refunding all or any portion of an issue of bonds or notes then outstanding, including the amount of any redemption premium and costs of issuance related thereto; provided, however, that no such refunding bonds shall be payable over a period longer than the period during which the original bonds or notes so refunded must be paid pursuant to law, and provided further that the present value of the principal and interest payments due on refunding bonds issued under this section shall not exceed the present value of the principal and interest payments to be paid by the state on account of bonds or notes to be refunded.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 23.

35-8-27.
Variable rate obligations and interest rate exchange agreements.

In connection with the issuance of duly authorized bonds or notes of the state, notwithstanding any other authority to the contrary, such bonds or notes may be issued in the form of variable rate obligations, so-called. In connection therewith, the state, acting through the general treasurer, may enter into agreements with banks, trust companies or other financial institutions within or without the state, whether in the form of letters or lines of credit, liquidity facilities, insurance or other support arrangements. Any debt issued as variable rate obligations shall bear such terms as the general treasurer shall determine, including provisions for prepayment at any time with or without premium at the option of the state, may be sold at a premium or discount, and may bear interest or not and if interest bearing, may bear interest at such rate or rates variable from time to time as determined by such index, banking loan rate or other method specified in any such agreement. Any such agreement may also include such other covenants and provisions for protecting the rights, security and remedy of the lenders as may, in the discretion of the general treasurer, be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law. The general treasurer may also enter into agreements with brokers for the placement or marketing of any such debt or notes of the state issued as variable rate obligations.

In addition, the general treasurer, with the approval of the governor, may from time to time, enter into and amend interest rate exchange agreements including, but not limited to, interest rate “caps”, “floors”, “collars”, or “swaps” that the general treasurer determines to be necessary or desirable for the purpose of generating savings, managing an interest rate, or similar risk that arises in connection with, or subsequent to or is incidental to the issuance, carrying or securing of variable rate obligations, fixed rate bonds or fixed rate obligations. Such interest rate exchange agreements entered into by the state shall contain such provisions, including payment, term, security, default and remedy provisions, and shall be with such parties, as the general treasurer shall determine to be necessary or desirable after due consideration to the creditworthiness of those parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 23.

35-8-28.
Interest earnings on state bonded indebtedness — Federal requirements.

Notwithstanding any general or public law or rule to the contrary, income from investments in the capital development fund may be applied to capital purposes and shall not become part of the general fund of the state to the extent necessary to exempt (in whole or in part) the interest paid on such bonds or notes from federal taxation, to preserve and maintain any federal tax credits associated with such bonds or notes, or to preserve or maintain any refundable tax credits paid or to be paid to the state with regard to such bonds or notes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 7, § 1.